Connecticut, session 2026, HB05259.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (f) of section 10-253 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes,
educational services shall be provided by each local and regional board
of education to homeless children and youths in accordance with the
provisions of 42 USC 11431, et seq., [as amended from time to time]
revised to December 23, 2022. If a homeless child or youth is denied
school accommodations by a local or regional board of education on the
basis of residency, such homeless child or youth shall be entitled to a
hearing conducted pursuant to section 10-186. An unaccompanied
youth, as described in 42 USC 11434a, as amended from time to time,
shall be entitled to knowledge of and have access to all educational,
medical or similar records in the cumulative record of such
unaccompanied youth maintained by a local or regional board of
education.

House Bill No. 5259
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-125 2 of 2